Idaho, session 2026, S1270.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 37, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 16, Title 37, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 16
CELL-CULTIVATED ANIMAL PROTEIN LABELING REQUIREMENTS
37-1601. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, "cell-cultivated ani-
mal protein" means any animal cell-based food product produced or derived
from culturing animal cells outside of the animal's body, which may be re-
ferred to as "lab-grown meat," "cultivated meat," "cell-cultured meat," or
"fake meat."
37-1602. LABELING REQUIREMENTS FOR CELL-CULTIVATED ANIMAL PRO-
TEINS. (1) Any cell-cultivated animal protein product sold, distributed, or
offered for sale within the state of Idaho shall include labeling with the
phrase "lab-grown," "cell-cultivated," or "cell-cultured."
(2) The labeling shall:
(a) Appear on the principal display panel of the packaging; and
(b) Use a font size and style that ensures legibility to an average con-
sumer and is at least equal in prominence to the product name.
(3) Restaurants or other vendors that offer for sale cell-cultivated
animal proteins shall provide labeling on menus or equivalent notifications
consistent with this section.
(4) A cell-cultivated animal protein product that is not derived from
traditional livestock production or wild game harvest shall not be labeled,
advertised, or marketed using terms commonly associated with specific meat
cuts, including but not limited to "steak," "roast," "tri-tip," "loin," or
"brisket," unless otherwise authorized by the United States department of
agriculture.
37-1603. REGULATORY OVERSIGHT. The Idaho department of agriculture
shall have the authority to:


(1) Promulgate rules, subject to legislative approval, to enforce the
provisions of this chapter, including additional labeling standards if nec-
essary; and
(2) Conduct inspections and investigations to ensure compliance.
37-1604. PENALTIES. (1) Any person found in violation of this chapter
may be subject to a civil penalty by the Idaho department of agriculture of
not more than five hundred dollars ($500) per violation.
(2) No civil penalty shall be assessed for a violation that is the re-
sult of a good-faith error, provided the violation is promptly corrected
upon notice by the department.
(3) Enforcement under this section shall be directed to the manufac-
turer, producer, or person who labels or markets the cell-cultivated animal
protein product, and not to a retailer or food establishment that does not
alter the product labeling.
(4) Additional penalties for repeat offenses may be established by the
Idaho department of agriculture through rulemaking, subject to legislative
approval.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.